North Carolina, session 2025, SB962.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. CONTINGENT EFFECT FOR CERTAIN PROVISIONS OF THIS ACT
SECTION 1. Part II and Part III of this act become effective only if the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for the 2026-2027 fiscal year does not become law in the 2025
Regular Session of the General Assembly. In that case, the effective date of Part II and Part III
of this act shall be the earlier of the following:
(1) The first day after the General Assembly adjourns the 2025 Regular Session
sine die.
(2) January 1, 2027.

PART II. RAISE TEACHER SALARIES
SECTION 2.(a) The following monthly teacher salary schedule shall apply for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to licensed personnel of the public schools who are classified as teachers.
The salary schedule is based on years of teaching experience.
2026-2027 Teacher Monthly Salary Schedule
Years of Experience "A" Teachers
0 $4,600
1 $4,685
2 $4,770
3 $4,855
4 $4,940
5 $5,025
6 $5,110
7 $5,195
8 $5,280
*S962-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
9 $5,365
10 $5,450
11 $5,535
12 $5,620
13 $5,705
14 $5,790
15 $5,875
16 $5,950
17-19 $6,070
20-22 $6,135
23-25 $6,200
26-28 $6,295
29+ $6,370
SECTION 2.(b) Salary Supplements for Teachers Paid on This Salary Schedule. –
(1) Licensed teachers who have NBPTS certification shall receive a salary
supplement each month of twelve percent (12%) of their monthly salary on
the "A" salary schedule.
(2) Licensed teachers who are classified as "M" teachers shall receive a salary
supplement each month of ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the
"A" salary schedule.
(3) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
six-year degree level shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred
twenty-six dollars ($126.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(4) Licensed teachers with licensure based on academic preparation at the
doctoral degree level shall receive a salary supplement of two hundred
fifty-three dollars ($253.00) per month in addition to the supplement provided
to them as "M" teachers.
(5) Certified school nurses shall receive a salary supplement each month of ten
percent (10%) of their monthly salary on the "A" salary schedule.
(6) School counselors who are licensed as counselors at the master's degree level
or higher shall receive a salary supplement of one hundred dollars ($100.00)
per month.
SECTION 2.(c) For school psychologists, school speech pathologists who are
licensed as speech pathologists at the master's degree level or higher, and school audiologists
who are licensed as audiologists at the master's degree level or higher, the following shall apply:
(1) The first step of the salary schedule shall be equivalent to the sixth step of the
"A" salary schedule.
(2) These employees shall receive the following salary supplements each month:
a. Ten percent (10%) of their monthly salary, excluding the supplement
provided pursuant to sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. Five hundred dollars ($500.00).
(3) These employees are eligible to receive salary supplements equivalent to those
of teachers for academic preparation at the six-year degree level or the
doctoral degree level.
(4) The twenty-sixth step of the salary schedule shall be seven and one-half
percent (7.5%) higher than the salary received by these same employees on
the twenty-fifth step of the salary schedule.
SECTION 2.(d) Beginning with the 2014-2015 fiscal year, in lieu of providing
annual longevity payments to teachers paid on the teacher salary schedule, the amounts of those
longevity payments are included in the monthly amounts under the teacher salary schedule.
Page 2 Senate Bill 962-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(e) A teacher compensated in accordance with this salary schedule for
the 2026-2027 school year shall receive an amount equal to the greater of the following:
(1) The applicable amount on the salary schedule for the applicable school year.
(2) For teachers who were eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school year,
the sum of the following:
a. The salary the teacher received in the 2013-2014 school year pursuant
to Section 35.11 of S.L. 2013-360.
b. The longevity that the teacher would have received under the longevity
system in effect for the 2013-2014 school year provided in Section
35.11 of S.L. 2013-360 based on the teacher's current years of service.
c. The annual bonus provided in Section 9.1(e) of S.L. 2014-100.
(3) For teachers who were not eligible for longevity for the 2013-2014 school
year, the sum of the salary and annual bonus the teacher received in the
2014-2015 school year pursuant to Section 9.1 of S.L. 2014-100.
SECTION 2.(f) As used in this section, the term "teacher" shall also include
instructional support personnel.
SECTION 2.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2026-2027 fiscal year the sum of nine hundred twenty-one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($921,200,000) in recurring funds to implement the teacher raises
provided in this section.

PART III. PAY RAISES FOR STATE EMPLOYEES/COMMUNITY
COLLEGES/UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA AND COST-OF-LIVING
INCREASES FOR RETIREES

ELIGIBLE STATE-FUNDED EMPLOYEES AWARDED COST-OF-LIVING
ADJUSTMENT/LEGISLATIVE SALARY INCREASES
SECTION 3.1.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, except as provided by subsection (c) of
this section, a person (i) whose salary is set by this Part, pursuant to the North Carolina Human
Resources Act or as otherwise authorized in this act, and (ii) who is employed in a State-funded
position on June 30, 2025, is awarded a compensation adjustment as follows:
(1) Six percent (6%) effective July 1, 2026.
(2) As otherwise allowed or provided by law.
SECTION 3.1.(b) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the following persons are not
eligible to receive the legislative salary increases provided by subsection (a) of this section:
(1) Employees of local boards of education.
(2) Local community college employees.
(3) Employees of The University of North Carolina.
(4) Clerks of superior court compensated under G.S. 7A-101.
(5) Officers and employees of the Department of Adult Correction or Department
of Public Safety to which Section 3.7 or 3.8 of this Part applies.
(6) State law enforcement officers to which Section 3.9 of this Part applies.
(7) Employees of the State Highway Patrol to which Section 3.9A of this Part
applies.
(8) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health and Human
Services, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Adult
Correction, the Governor Morehead School for the Blind, the Eastern North
Carolina School for the Deaf, the North Carolina School for the Deaf, and the
State Board of Education who are paid based on the Teacher Salary Schedule.
SECTION 3.1.(c) Permanent part-time employees shall receive the increase
authorized by this section on a prorated and equitable basis.
Senate Bill 962-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.1.(d) No eligible State-funded employee shall be prohibited from
receiving the full salary increase provided in this section solely because the employee's salary
after applying the legislative increase is above the maximum of the salary range prescribed by
the State Human Resources Commission.

RECEIPT-SUPPORTED COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT RESERVE
SECTION 3.2. State Agencies are authorized to use the funding allotted to them
from the Receipt-Supported Cost-of-Living Adjustment Reserve to fundshift a limited number
of receipt-supported positions in the General Fund to net appropriation funding.

RETENTION PAY FOR STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 3.3.(a) All references to "longevity" pay in Chapter 126 of the General
Statutes shall be replaced with "retention" pay.
SECTION 3.3.(b) The amount of retention pay provided to employees who are
full-time or over half-time and have a permanent, time-limited, or probationary appointment and
who are in pay status for one-half of the regularly scheduled workdays and holidays in a pay
period shall be increased to the following amounts:
Years of Total Service Retention Pay Percentage
2 but less than 5 years 1.0%
5 but less than 10 years 1.5%
10 but less than 15 years 2.0%
15 but less than 20 years 2.5%
20 but less than 25 years 3.5%
25 or more years 4.5%

RETENTION BONUS AWARDED FOR FISCAL YEAR
SECTION 3.4.(a) Any person (i) whose salary is set by this Part or set pursuant to
the North Carolina Human Resources Act and (ii) who is continuously employed by the State or
a public school unit from July 1, 2026, to October 31, 2026, shall be awarded a retention bonus
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500.00), payable during the
month of November 2026. For otherwise eligible local education employees, eligibility for the
bonus shall be measured beginning not on July 1, 2026, but on the first day when staff report for
the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 3.4.(b) Any person (i) whose salary is set by this Part or set pursuant to
the North Carolina Human Resources Act and (ii) who is continuously employed by the State or
a public school unit from November 1, 2026, to March 31, 2027, shall be awarded an additional
retention bonus for the 2026-2027 fiscal year in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500.00),
payable during the month of April 2027.
SECTION 3.4.(c) Employers of State employees and local education employees
shall provide an additional retention bonus of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00), payable
during the month of November 2026, to all permanent full-time State employees and local
education employees who are continuously employed by the State or a public school unit from
July 1, 2026, to October 31, 2026, and who earn an annual salary that does not exceed
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).
SECTION 3.4.(d) Employers of State employees and local education employees
shall provide an additional retention bonus of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00), payable
during the month of April 2027, to all permanent full-time State employees and local education
employees who are employed by the State or a public school unit from November 1, 2026, to
March 31, 2027, and who earn an annual salary that does not exceed seventy-five thousand
dollars ($75,000).
Page 4 Senate Bill 962-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.4.(e) The funds appropriated for retention bonuses in excess of the
amounts required to implement these bonuses shall revert and not be credited to the Pay Plan
Reserve.
SECTION 3.4.(f) Notwithstanding G.S. 135-1(7a), the compensation bonuses
awarded by this section are not compensation under Article 1 of Chapter 135 of the General
Statutes, the Teachers' and State Employees' Retirement System.
SECTION 3.4.(g) The compensation bonuses awarded by this section are not part
of annual salary and shall be paid out separately. The compensation bonus shall be awarded to
eligible permanent employees without regard to an employee's placement within the salary range,
including employees at the top of the salary range. The compensation bonus shall be adjusted pro
rata for permanent part-time employees.

COMMUNITY COLLEGES
SECTION 3.5.(a) Effective July 1, 2026, the State Board of Community Colleges
shall provide community college faculty and non-faculty personnel with an across-the-board
salary increase in the amount of six percent (6%).
SECTION 3.5.(b) The minimum salaries for nine-month, full-time curriculum
community college faculty for the 2026-2027 fiscal year are as follows:
Education Level FY 2026-27
Vocational Diploma/Certificate or Less $45,746
Associate Degree or Equivalent 46,383
Bachelor's Degree 49,142
Master's Degree or Education Specialist 51,591
Doctoral Degree 55,120
SECTION 3.5.(c) No full-time faculty member shall earn less than the minimum
salary for his or her education level. The pro rata hourly rate of the minimum salary for each
education level shall be used to determine the minimum salary for part-time faculty members.

UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM
SECTION 3.6.(a) Effective for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the annual salaries
of The University of North Carolina SHRA employees shall be increased as provided by Section
3.1 of this Part.
SECTION 3.6.(b) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the Board of Governors of The
University of North Carolina may provide EHRA employees a salary increase pursuant to the
policies adopted by the Board. Funds for EHRA compensation increases may be used for any
one or more of the following purposes: (i) merit pay, (ii) across-the-board increases, (iii)
recruitment bonuses, (iv) retention increases, and (v) any other compensation increase pursuant
to those policies.
SECTION 3.6.(c) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall
make a report on the use of compensation increases and bonus funds to the General Assembly by
no later than March 1 of each year of the biennium.

CORRECTIONAL OFFICER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 3.7.(a) State employees serving as correctional officers in the Department
of Adult Correction shall be compensated at a specific pay rate on the basis of a salary schedule
determined according to the duration of the employee's correctional officer work experience.
SECTION 3.7.(a1) State employees serving in the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, shall be compensated at a specific pay
rate set on the basis of a salary schedule determined according to the duration of the employee's
work experience, as follows:
Senate Bill 962-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Youth Counselor Technicians shall be paid under the Correctional Officer I
salary schedule.
(2) Youth Services Behavioral Specialists shall be paid under the Correctional
Officer II salary schedule.
(3) Youth Counselors shall be paid under the Correctional Officer III salary
schedule.
SECTION 3.7.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under this section
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, effective July 1, 2026:

FY 2026-27
Experience COI COII COIII
0 $39,913 $41,226 $44,089
1 $42,705 $44,110 $47,176
2 $45,269 $46,804 $50,008
3 $47,531 $49,095 $52,508
4 $49,432 $51,059 $54,608
5 $50,916 $52,590 $56,246
6+ $51,935 $53,642 $57,371

PROBATION AND PAROLE OFFICER/JUVENILE COURT COUNSELORS –
SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 3.8.(a) Probation and parole officers shall be compensated pursuant to
the experience-based salary schedule based on the officer's respective work experience, as
established in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.8.(a1) State employees serving in the Department of Public Safety,
Division of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, as Juvenile Court Counselors shall be
compensated under the probation and parole officer salary schedule.
SECTION 3.8.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsections
(a) and (a1) of this section for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, effective July 1, 2026:

Years of Experience FY 2026-27
0 $48,189
1 51,320
2 54,658
3 58,209
4 61,994
5 66,023
6+ 70,314

STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 3.9.(a) Law enforcement officers of the Alcohol Law Enforcement and
the State Bureau of Investigation compensated pursuant to an experience-based salary schedule
shall be compensated based on the officer's respective work experience pursuant to the salary
schedule in subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.9.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, effective July 1, 2026:

Years of Experience FY 2026-27
0 $56,733
1 60,423
2 64,350
Page 6 Senate Bill 962-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3 68,533
4 72,988
5 77,732
6+ 82,785

STATE HIGHWAY PATROL/SALARY SCHEDULE
SECTION 3.9A.(a) Law enforcement officers of the State Highway Patrol
compensated pursuant to an experience-based salary schedule shall be compensated based on the
officer's respective work experience pursuant to the salary schedule in subsection (b) of this
section.
SECTION 3.9A.(b) The following annual salary schedule applies under subsection
(a) of this section for the 2026-2027 fiscal year, effective July 1, 2026:

Years of Experience FY 2026-27
0 $58,350
1 62,142
2 66,181
3 70,483
4 75,064
5 79,943
6+ 85,140

STATE AGENCY TEACHERS
SECTION 3.10.(a) Employees of schools operated by the Department of Health and
Human Services, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Adult Correction, and the
State Board of Education who are paid on the Teacher Salary Schedule shall be paid as authorized
in this act.
SECTION 3.10.(b) Employees of the School of Science and Mathematics of The
University of North Carolina who are paid pursuant to a salary schedule adopted by the North
Carolina School of Science and Mathematics Board of Trustees shall be paid in accordance with
the schedule adopted by the Board.
SECTION 3.10.(c) Employees of the Governor Morehead School for the Blind, the
Eastern North Carolina School for the Deaf, and the North Carolina School for the Deaf shall be
paid as authorized in this act.

ALL STATE-SUPPORTED PERSONNEL/FLEXIBLE ADMINISTRATION OF
COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENTS
SECTION 3.11.(a) The cost-of-living adjustments authorized for the 2026-2027
fiscal year shall be paid effective on July 1, 2026, and do not apply to persons separated from
service due to resignation, dismissal, reduction in force, death, or retirement or whose last
workday is prior to June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3.11.(b) The Director of the Budget is granted flexibility to administer
the compensation increases enacted by this act.
SECTION 3.11.(c) The State employer contribution rates enacted by this act for
retirement and related benefits may be deemed by the Director of the Budget for administrative
purposes to become effective after July 1 of the applicable fiscal year to provide flexibility in the
collection and reconciliation of salary-related contributions as required by law, provided the
estimated amount contributed to any affected employee benefit trust equals the amount that
would have been contributed to the employee benefit trust if the enacted employer contribution
rates had been effective on July 1 of the applicable fiscal year.
Senate Bill 962-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.11.(d) This section applies to all employees paid from State funds,
whether or not subject to or exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act, including
employees of public schools, community colleges, and The University of North Carolina.

MOST STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 3.12. Unless otherwise expressly provided by this Part, the annual salaries
in effect for the following persons on June 30, 2026, shall be legislatively increased as provided
by Section 3.1 of this act:
(1) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons whose salaries are set in
accordance with the State Human Resources Act.
(2) Permanent, full-time State officials and persons in positions exempt from the
State Human Resources Act.
(3) Permanent, part-time State employees.
(4) Temporary and permanent hourly State employees.

USE OF FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT/BENEFIT
INCREASES
SECTION 3.13.(a) The Office of State Budget and Management shall ensure that
the appropriations made in this act for cost-of-living adjustments and employee benefits are used
only for these purposes.
SECTION 3.13.(b) If the Director of the Budget determines that funds appropriated
to a State agency for mandated salary increases and employee benefits exceed the amount
required by that agency for those purposes, the Director may reallocate those funds to other State
agencies that received insufficient funds for required cost-of-living and benefit increases.
SECTION 3.13.(c) Funds appropriated for cost-of-living adjustments and employee
benefit increases may not be used to adjust the budgeted salaries of vacant positions or to provide
salary increases in excess of those required by the General Assembly except to increase the
budgeted salary of any position to the minimum of the position's salary range and to meet
retention pay needs.
SECTION 3.13.(d) Any funds appropriated for cost-of-living adjustment and
employee benefit increases in excess of the amounts required to implement the increases pursuant
to subsection (c) of this section shall be credited to the Pay Plan Reserve.
SECTION 3.13.(e) No later than March 1, the Office of State Budget and
Management shall report to the Fiscal Research Division on the expenditure of funds for
legislatively mandated salary increases and employee benefits. This report shall include at least
the following information for each State agency:
(1) The total amount of funds that the agency received for legislatively mandated
salary increases and employee benefits.
(2) The total amount of funds transferred from the agency to other State agencies
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. This section of the report shall
identify the amounts transferred to each recipient State agency.
(3) The total amount of funds used by the agency for legislatively mandated salary
increases and employee benefits.
(4) The amount of funds used pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

MITIGATE BONUS LEAVE
SECTION 3.14. During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, State agencies, departments,
institutions, the North Carolina Community College System, and The University of North
Carolina may offer State employees the opportunity to use or to cash in special bonus leave
benefits that have accrued pursuant to Section 28.3A of S.L. 2002-126, Section 30.12B(a) of S.L.
Page 8 Senate Bill 962-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2003-284, Section 29.14A of S.L. 2005-276, and Section 35.10A of S.L. 2014-100, but only if
all of the following requirements are met:
(1) Employee participation in the program must be voluntary.
(2) Special leave that is liquidated for cash payment to an employee must be
valued at the amount based on the employee's current annual salary rate.
(3) By September 1, 2026, a report on the demographic information shall be
submitted to the respective agency head or employing agency and to the Fiscal
Research Division.

PROVIDE COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENT FOR RETIREES OF THE TEACHERS'
AND STATE EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM, THE CONSOLIDATED
JUDICIAL RETIREMENT SYSTEM, AND THE LEGISLATIVE RETIREMENT
SYSTEM
SECTION 3.15.(a) G.S. 135-5 is amended by adding the following new subsections
to read:
"(aaaa) Effective July 1, 2026, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2025, is increased by two percent
(2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2026, in accordance with subsection (o) of this section.
Effective July 1, 2026, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose
retirement commenced after July 1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, is increased by a prorated
amount of two percent (2%), as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of
months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2026.
(bbbb) After September 1, 2026, but on or before October 31, 2026, a one-time cost of living
supplement payment shall be made to, or on account of, beneficiaries who are living as of
September 1, 2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2026. The
payment shall be one percent (1%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as
of September 1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the
beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's
legal representative. No beneficiary shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments
under this Article."
SECTION 3.15.(b) G.S. 135-65 is amended by adding the following new
subsections to read:
"(ll) Effective July 1, 2026, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of,
beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2025, is increased by two percent
(2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2026. Effective July 1, 2026, the retirement allowance
payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2025, but
before June 30, 2026, is increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%), as determined by
the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid
between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2026.
(mm) After September 1, 2026, but on or before October 31, 2026, a one-time cost-of-living
supplement payment shall be made to, or on account of, beneficiaries who are living as of
September 1, 2026, and whose retirement commenced on or before September 1, 2026. The
payment shall be one percent (1%) of the beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as
of September 1, 2026, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the
beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's
legal representative. No beneficiary shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments
under this Article."
SECTION 3.15.(c) G.S. 120-4.22A is amended by adding the following new
subsections to read:
"(ff) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, effective July 1, 2026, the retirement
allowance payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before
Senate Bill 962-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
January 1, 2026, is increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June 1, 2026.
Effective July 1, 2026, the retirement allowance payable to, or on account of, beneficiaries whose
retirement commenced after January 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2026, is increased by a prorated
amount of two percent (2%), as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of
months that a retirement allowance was paid between January 1, 2026, and June 30, 2026.
(gg) In accordance with subsection (a) of this section, after September 1, 2026, but on or
before October 31, 2026, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to, or on
account of, beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2026, and whose retirement
commenced on or before September 1, 2026. The payment shall be one percent (1%) of the
beneficiary's annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2026, and shall not be
prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before the payment is
made, then the payment shall be payable to the member's legal representative. No beneficiary
shall have a vested right to any future supplemental payments under this Article."

APPROPRIATION FOR PAY RAISES FOR STATE EMPLOYEES/COMMUNITY
COLLEGES/UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA AND COST-OF-LIVING
INCREASES FOR RETIREES
SECTION 3.16. To fund the pay increases and cost-of-living adjustments awarded
in this Part, the following funds are appropriated, effective July 1, 2026:
(1) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve for Compensation
Increases the sum of seven hundred one million one hundred thousand dollars
($701,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
(2) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve for Compensation
Increases the sum of five hundred three million five hundred thousand dollars
($503,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.

PART IV. CONTINUED RAISES FOR TEACHERS AND STATE EMPLOYEES IN THE
EVENT THE CURRENT OPERATIONS APPROPRIATIONS ACT DOES NOT
BECOME LAW
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 143C-5-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-5-4. Enactment deadline; procedures to be followed when the Current Operations
Appropriations Act does not become law prior to the end of certain fiscal years.
(a) Enactment Deadline. – The General Assembly shall enact the Current Operations
Appropriations Act by June 15 of odd-numbered years and by June 30 of even-numbered years
in which a Current Operations Appropriations Act is enacted.
(b) Procedure for Budget Continuation. – If a fiscal year begins for which no Current
Operations Appropriations Act providing for current operations of State government during that
fiscal year has become law, then the following procedures shall be followed and the following
limitations shall apply:
(1) Authority. – Unless otherwise provided by law, the Director of the Budget
may continue to allocate funds from all funds for expenditure by State
departments, institutions, and agencies at a level not to exceed the level of
those funds in the recurring certified budget for the prior fiscal year. If the
Director of the Budget finds that projected revenues for the fiscal year will not
support expenditures at the level of recurring expenditures for the prior fiscal
year, the Director of the Budget shall allot funds at a lower level. In making
these allocations, the Director of the Budget shall ensure the prompt payment
of the principal and interest on bonds and notes of the State according to their
terms. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the limitations and
directions on the expenditure of funds for the prior fiscal biennium shall
remain in effect. Except for funds appropriated for (i) capital improvement
Page 10 Senate Bill 962-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
projects or (ii) the implementation of information technology projects, the
Director of the Budget shall not allocate funds for items funded with
nonrecurring funds during the prior fiscal year.
(2) Appropriation of funds necessary to implement. – There is appropriated from
the appropriate State funds, cash balances, federal receipts, and departmental
receipts sums sufficient to implement the authority described in this
subsection for the applicable fiscal year.
(3) Relation to Current Operations Appropriations Act. – The appropriations and
the authorizations to allocate and spend funds which are set out in this
subsection shall remain in effect until the Current Operations Appropriations
Act for the applicable fiscal year becomes law, at which time that act shall
become effective and shall govern appropriations and expenditures. When the
Current Operations Appropriations Act for that fiscal year becomes law, the
Director of the Budget shall adjust allotments to give effect to that act from
July 1 of the fiscal year.
…
(5) State employee salaries. – The salary schedules and specific salaries
established for the prior fiscal year and in effect on June 30 of the prior fiscal
year for offices and positions shall remain in effect until the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for the current fiscal year becomes law. State
employees subject to G.S. 7A-102(c), 7A-171.1, 143B-1714, or any other
statutory salary schedule, shall not move up on salary schedules or receive
automatic increases, including automatic step increases, until authorized by
the General Assembly. State employees, including those exempt from the
classification and compensation rules established by the State Human
Resources Commission, shall not receive any automatic step increases,
annual, performance, merit, bonuses, or other increments until authorized by
the General Assembly.The State employee salary schedules, and any other
salary grade or salary range for State employees established pursuant to State
law that is in effect on June 30 of the prior fiscal year shall remain in effect
with an automatic statutory increase of five percent (5%) to each salary
schedule, salary grade, and salary range until the Current Operations
Appropriations Act for the current fiscal year becomes law.
(6) School Employee Salaries. – Public school employees paid on the teacher
salary schedule, the school-based administrator salary schedule, or any other
salary schedule established by State law shall not move up on salary schedules
or receive automatic step increases until authorized by the General
Assembly.The teacher salary schedule, the principal salary schedule, and any
other salary grade or salary range for public school employees established
pursuant to State law that is in effect on June 30 of the prior fiscal year shall
remain in effect with an automatic statutory increase of five percent (5%) to
each salary schedule, salary grade, and salary range until the Current
Operations Appropriations Act for the current fiscal year becomes law.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) This section applies beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal year.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 962-First Edition Page 11